Arkansas, session 2025, SB313.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-2-301(3), concerning the definition of
"designated receiving facility or program" regarding mental disease or
defect, is amended to read as follows:
(3) “Designated receiving facility or program” means an
inpatient or outpatient treatment facility or program that is designated
within each geographic area of the state by the Director of the Division of
Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human
Services to accept the responsibility for the care, custody, and treatment of
a person involuntarily admitted committed to the state mental health system
for mental health treatment;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-2-301(5), concerning the definition of
*CEB126*
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
"frivolous" regarding mental disease or defect, is amended to read as
follows:
(5) “Frivolous” means clearly lacking any a reasonable basis in
fact or law;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-2-301, concerning the definitions used
regarding mental disease or defect, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(14)(A) "Jail-based restoration services" means clinical and
educational services provided in a county jail to a defendant to assist in
the restoration of the defendant's fitness to proceed.
(B) "Jail-based restoration services" includes without
limitation mental health treatment, medical treatment, and substance abuse
treatment.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 5-2-304 is amended to read as follows:
5-2-304. Notice requirement.
(a) When a defendant intends to raise lack of criminal responsibility
as a an affirmative defense in a prosecution or put in issue his or her
fitness to proceed, the defendant shall notify the prosecutor and the court
at the earliest practicable time.
(b)(1) Failure to notify the prosecutor within a reasonable time
before the trial date entitles the prosecutor to a continuance that for
limitation purposes is deemed an excluded period granted on application of
the defendant.
(2) Alternatively, in lieu of suspending any further proceedings
under § 5-2-328, the court may order the immediate examination of the
defendant at a designated receiving facility or program by an expert.
(c) When the court or a party in a criminal proceeding has reason to
believe that a defendant is not fit to proceed, the court or a party shall
raise the question of the defendant’s fitness in the following manner:
(1) On its own motion, the court shall suspend the proceedings
and order an examination of the defendant pursuant to this subchapter; or
(2)(A) By written motion of the prosecutor or defense counsel
stating that the request is made in good faith and not for the purpose of
delay, and containing the facts and observations in support of the request.
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
(B) If the motion is denied, defense counsel may request
an ex parte or in camera filing and hearing if an ex parte or in camera
filing and hearing are necessary because the motion is based in whole or in
part on information protected by the attorney-client privilege.
(d) For good cause shown, a request for an evaluation may be made by
oral motion in court if the request:
(1) Is made in good faith and not for the purpose of delay; and
(2) Contains sufficient facts and observations in support of the
request for the court to consider the request.
(e) When the defendant intends to raise the lack of criminal responsibility
as an affirmative defense, the defendant shall file a notice of intent and
the circuit court shall suspend all further proceedings.
(f) Upon filing of an order for an examination of criminal
responsibility or fitness to proceed with a circuit clerk:
(1) The moving party shall immediately submit a copy of the
order to the Department of Human Services;
(2) The prosecutor shall submit a copy of the defendant’s case
file to the department;
(3) The attorney for the defendant shall submit to the
department either:
(A) A release of protected health information, signed by
the defendant, with a list of all known previous healthcare providers; or
(B) If the defendant cannot provide consent, a court order
for the production of records; and
(4) The attorney for the defendant shall make all reasonable
efforts to provide any medical, psychiatric, or treatment records that may be
relevant to the examination to the department.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 5-2-310 is amended to read as follows:
5-2-310. Lack of fitness to proceed — Procedures subsequent to finding.
(a)(1)(A) If the court determines that a defendant lacks fitness to
proceed, the proceeding against him or her shall be suspended and the court
may commit the defendant to the custody of the Department of Human Services
for detention, care, and treatment until restoration of fitness to proceed.
(B) If the court determines that a defendant lacks fitness
to proceed because of a mental disease or defect that precludes the
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
possibility of restoration, the court shall direct the defendant to available
services and supports as recommended by the department.
(C) However, if If the court is satisfied that the
defendant may be released without danger to himself or herself or to the
person or property of another, the court may order the defendant's release
and the release shall continue at the discretion of the court on conditions
the court determines necessary.
(D) If the court finds that the defendant lacks fitness to
proceed or that the defendant is fit to proceed but that the defendant’s
fitness to proceed depends on the continuation of appropriate treatment for a
mental disease or defect, the court shall consider issues relating to
treatment necessary to restore or maintain the defendant’s fitness to
proceed.
(E) If the court finds that the defendant may be treated
in the community, the court may make receipt of reasonable medical treatment
a condition of his or her release.
(F) The court may order the administration of medication
to maintain the fitness to proceed of an incarcerated defendant if the
defendant is a danger to himself or herself or others and refuses to take the
medication required to maintain his or her fitness to proceed.
(G) The court may order the administration of medication
to maintain the fitness to proceed of an incarcerated defendant if the
defendant is not a danger to himself or herself or others and refuses to take
the medication required to maintain his or her fitness to proceed if the
court finds that:
(i) The treatment is medically appropriate;
(ii) All less intrusive alternatives have been
considered;
(iii) The treatment is substantially unlikely to
produce a side effect that may undermine the fairness of the trial; and
(iv) There is a substantial government interest in
the prosecution of the defendant.
(H) Days spent in the physical custody of the department
under this subsection are considered days spent in custody for determining
credit for time served.
(2) A copy of the report filed under § 5-2-327 shall be attached to the
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
order of commitment or order of conditional release.
(3)(A) At any time after the issue of a defendant's fitness to
proceed has been raised, the court may, on a motion of the state, dismiss all
charges pending against the defendant.
(B) If the court dismisses the charges pending against a
defendant, the proceedings shall discontinue, and the defendant shall be
discharged.
(b)(1) Within a reasonable period of time, but in any case within ten
(10) not to exceed six (6) months of a commitment pursuant to subsection (a)
of this section, the department shall file with the committing court a
written report indicating whether the defendant is fit to proceed, or if not,
whether:
(A) The defendant's mental disease or defect is of a
nature precluding restoration of fitness to proceed or it does not appear
that the defendant will become fit to proceed within the reasonably
foreseeable future; and
(B) The defendant presents a danger to himself or herself
or to the person or property of another.
(2)(A) The court shall make a determination within one (1) year
eight (8) months of a commitment pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
(B) Pursuant to the report of the department or as a
result of a hearing on the report, if the court determines that the defendant
is fit to proceed, prosecution in ordinary course may commence.
(C) If the defendant lacks fitness to proceed but does not
present a danger to himself or herself or to the person or property of
another, the court may release the defendant on conditions the court
determines to be proper.
(D) If the defendant lacks fitness to proceed and presents
a danger to himself or herself or the person or property of another, the
court shall order the department to petition for an involuntary admission
commitment.
(E) Upon filing of an order finding that the defendant
lacks fitness to proceed issued under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section
with a circuit clerk or a probate clerk, the circuit clerk or the probate
clerk shall submit a copy of the order to the Arkansas Crime Information
Center.
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
(c)(1) On the court's own motion or upon application of the
department, the prosecuting attorney, or the defendant, and after a hearing
if a hearing is requested, if the court determines that the defendant has
regained fitness to proceed, the criminal proceeding shall be resumed.
(2) If the defendant has been receiving and responding well to
treatment, including medication, the court may make appropriate orders for
the continued treatment or administration of medication, or both to maintain
the fitness of the defendant throughout the remainder of the proceedings.
(3) However, if the court is of the view that so much time has
elapsed since the alleged commission of the offense in question that it would
be unjust to resume the criminal proceeding, the court may dismiss the charge
regardless of whether the defendant has regained fitness to proceed.
(4)(A) On either the motion of the court or the state, a hearing
shall be held to determine whether the charges against a defendant who lacks
fitness to proceed due to mental disease or defect may be dismissed if the
defendant remains without fitness to proceed for five (5) continuous years
from the date of determination of lack of fitness.
(B) If the charges are dismissed, the dismissal shall be
without prejudice to the state.
(C) If the court moves for a hearing, the state shall have
notice of at least sixty (60) days before the hearing date unless the state
consents to another date.
(d)(1) Persons authorized by this section to administer treatment or
medication shall not be criminally liable for administering treatment or
medication pursuant to this subchapter if done in good faith.
(2) Persons authorized to administer treatment or medication
shall not be civilly liable for such activities when the persons acted in a
reasonable manner and according to generally accepted medical and other
professional practices.
(e)(1) A law enforcement officer or a corrections officer may employ
reasonable force in cases where an individual refuses administration of
court-ordered treatment or medication.
(2) A law enforcement officer or a corrections officer shall not
be criminally or civilly liable for the use of reasonable force under
subdivision (e)(1) of this section.

04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 2, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-2-318. Restoration in county jails.
(a) Jail-based restoration services shall be permitted through
telehealth.
(b) Jail-based restoration services that involve procedures other than
or in addition to telehealth services may be provided upon the consent of the
county sheriff or the keeper, superintendent, or administrator of the county
jail.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 5-2-327 is amended to read as follows:
5-2-327. Examination of defendant — Fitness to proceed.
(a)(1)(A) Any party, by written motion, or the court, on
the court's own motion, may raise the issue of the defendant's fitness to
proceed.
(B) A written motion by the prosecuting attorney or
defense counsel shall:
(i) State that the motion for examination of the
defendant is made in good faith and not for the purpose of delay; and
(ii) Include facts and observations to support the
motion for examination of the defendant.
(C) If the motion is denied, defense counsel may request
an ex parte or in camera filing and hearing if an ex parte or in camera
filing and hearing are necessary because the motion is based in whole or in
part on information protected by the attorney-client privilege.
(D) For good cause shown, a request for an evaluation may
be made by oral motion in court if the request:
(i) Is made in good faith and not for the purpose of
delay; and
(ii) Contains sufficient facts and observations in
support of the request for the court to consider the request.
(2) The court shall order an examination under this section if
it finds there is a reasonable suspicion that a defendant is not fit to
proceed.
(3) The court may dismiss a motion for examination under this
section if the court determines that the motion:
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
(A) Is frivolous; or
(B) Has stated no facts to support the request for
examination.
(3)(4)(A) Subject to §§ 5-2-304 and 5-2-311, the court shall
immediately suspend further proceedings in a prosecution if it has ordered an
examination under this section.
(B)(i) If a jury has been impaneled and the court suspends
proceedings under subdivision (a)(3)(A) (a)(4)(A) of this section, the court
may retain the jury or declare a mistrial and discharge the jury.
(ii) A discharge of the jury is not a bar to further
prosecution.
(4)(5)(A) If a court suspends further proceedings in the
prosecution under subdivision (a)(3)(A) (a)(4)(A) of this section, the court
shall enter an order:
(A) Appointing one (1) or more experts who do not practice
in the Arkansas State Hospital to examine the defendant and report on the
defendant's mental condition; or
(B)(i) Directing directing the Director of the Division of
Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human
Services to provide an expert who will examine and report upon the
defendant's mental condition.
(ii)(B) The director or his or her designee shall
determine the location of the examination required under subdivision
(a)(4)(B)(i) (a)(5)(A) of this section.
(b) An examination ordered under this section shall be for a period
not exceeding sixty (60) days unless the director or his or her designee
determines a longer period of examination is necessary for the purpose of the
examination.
(c) The department shall provide for or arrange the fitness to proceed
examination of the defendant at a jail, prison, community setting, or
psychiatric hospital.
(d)(1) A uniform order to be used by a court ordering an examination
of a defendant's fitness to proceed under this section shall be developed by
the Administrative Office of the Courts in conjunction with the following
organizations:
(A) The Arkansas Prosecuting Attorneys Association;
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
(B) The Department of Human Services; and
(C) The Arkansas Public Defender Commission.
(2) The uniform order developed under this subsection shall
contain the following information:
(A) The defendant's name, age, gender, and race;
(B) The criminal charges pending against the defendant;
(C) The defendant's attorney's name and address;
(D) The defendant's custody status;
(E) The case number for which the examination was ordered;
(F) A unique identifying number on the incident reporting
form as required by the Arkansas Crime Information Center; and
(G) The name of the requesting attorney, if applicable;
and
(H) An authorization to release and receive protected
health information.
(3) An examination under this section shall not be conducted
without using the uniform order required under this subsection.
(4) The uniform order shall require the prosecuting attorney to
provide to the examiner any information relevant to the examination,
including without limitation:
(A) The name and address of any attorney involved in the
matter; and
(B) Information about the alleged offense.
(5) The court may shall require the attorney for the defendant
to make all reasonable efforts to provide to the examiner any available
information relevant to the examination, including without limitation:
(A) Psychiatric records;
(B) Medical records; or
(C) Records pertaining to treatment of the defendant for
substance or alcohol abuse.
(d)(e)(1) An examination report ordered under this section shall be
filed with the clerk of the court ordering the examination and is a public
record.
(2) The court clerk shall provide copies of the examination
report to the defendant's attorney and the prosecuting attorney.
(e)(f)(1) An examination report prepared by an examiner ordered under
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
this section shall:
(A) Contain an opinion as to whether or not the defendant
is fit to proceed and the basis for the opinion;
(B) Contain an opinion as to whether the defendant has a
mental disease or defect;
(C) Contain a substantiated diagnosis in the terminology
of the American Psychiatric Association's most current edition of the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders;
(D) Document that the examiner explained to the defendant:
(i) The purpose of the examination;
(ii) The persons to whom the examination report is
provided; and
(iii) The limits on rules of confidentiality
applying to the relationship between the examiner and the defendant; and
(E) Describe, in specific terms:
(i) The procedures, techniques, and tests used in
the examination;
(ii) The purpose of each procedure, technique, or
test; and
(iii) The conclusions reached; and
(F) An opinion as to whether the defendant:
(i) Presents a substantial danger to himself or
herself, others, or property; and
(ii) Presents a substantial risk to public safety
without a prescribed regimen of medical, psychiatric, or psychological care
or treatment.
(2) An examiner's opinion on the defendant's fitness to proceed
or lack of fitness to proceed may not be based solely on the defendant's
refusal to communicate during the examination.
(3)(A) During an examination to determine a defendant's fitness
to proceed and in any examination report based on that examination, an
examiner shall consider:
(i) The capacity of the defendant during criminal
proceedings to:
(a) Rationally understand the charges against
him or her and the potential consequences of the pending criminal
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
proceedings;
(b) Disclose to the defendant's attorney
pertinent facts, events, and states of mind;
(c) Engage in a reasoned choice of legal
strategies and options;
(d) Understand the adversarial nature of
criminal proceedings;
(e) Exhibit appropriate courtroom behavior;
and
(f) Testify;
(ii) As supported by current indications and the
defendant's personal history, whether the defendant is a person with:
(a) A mental disease or defect; or
(b) An intellectual disability; and
(iii) The degree of impairment resulting from the
mental disease or defect or intellectual disability, if existent, and the
specific impact on the defendant's capacity to engage with the defendant's
attorney in an effective manner.
(B) The information or lack of information contained in
the examiner's report is not intended to limit the introduction of evidence
regarding the defendant's fitness to proceed.
(4) If the examiner concludes that the defendant lacks fitness
to proceed, the report shall contain:
(A) An opinion of the condition causing the lack of
fitness to proceed;
(B) An opinion of the treatment necessary for the
defendant to obtain fitness to proceed; and
(C) An opinion on the likelihood of the defendant
attaining fitness to proceed under treatment.
(f)(g) This subchapter does not preclude the defendant from having an
examination conducted by an expert of the defendant's own choosing to
determine the defendant's fitness to proceed, and the court shall provide the
defendant's expert with a reasonable opportunity to examine the defendant
upon a timely request.
(g)(h) When the defendant has previously been found fit to proceed,
the court may order a second or subsequent examination to determine a
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
defendant's fitness to proceed only if the court:
(1) Finds reasonable cause to believe that new or previously
undiscovered evidence calls into question the factual, legal, or scientific
basis of the opinion upon which the previous finding of fitness relied;
(2) Finds reasonable cause to believe that the defendant's
mental condition has changed; or
(3) Sets forth in the order a factual or legal basis upon which
to order another examination.
(h)(i) Upon completion of examination under this section, the court
may enter an order providing for further examination of the defendant and may
order the defendant into the custody of the director for further examination
and observation if the court determines that commitment and further
examination are is warranted.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 5-2-328(a), concerning the procedure when a
defendant intends to raise lack of criminal responsibility as an affirmative
defense, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4) An examination under this section shall be conducted only
after the circuit court has found the defendant fit to proceed.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 5-2-328(b)(2), concerning the uniform order
for examination of a defendant's lack of criminal responsibility, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) The uniform order developed under this subsection shall
contain, without limitation, the following information:
(A) The defendant's name, age, gender, and race;
(B) The criminal charges pending against the defendant;
(C) The defendant's attorney's name and address;
(D) The defendant's custody status;
(E) The case number for which the examination was ordered;
(F) A unique identifying number on the incident reporting
form as required by the Arkansas Crime Information Center; and
(G) The name of the requesting attorney, if applicable;
and
(H) An authorization to release and receive protected
health information.
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 5-2-328(b)(4), concerning an order for
examination of a defendant's lack of criminal responsibility, is amended to
read as follows:
(4) The circuit court may shall require the attorney for the
defendant to provide to the examiner a signed release of information and any
available information relevant to the examination, including without
limitation:
(A) Psychiatric records;
(B) Medical records; or
(C) Records pertaining to treatment of the defendant for
substance or alcohol abuse.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 5-2-328(c), concerning the report of an
examination of a defendant's lack of criminal responsibility, is amended to
read as follows:
(c) An examination report prepared by an examiner ordered under this
section shall contain:
(1) A description of the nature of the examination;
(2) An opinion as to whether as the result of a mental disease
or defect the defendant at the time of the alleged offense lacked the
capacity to appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct or to conform
his or her conduct to the requirements of the law, an explanation of the
examiner's opinion, and the basis of that opinion;
(3) When directed by the circuit court, an opinion as to whether
at the time of the alleged offense the defendant lacked the capacity to form
a culpable mental state that is required to establish an element of the
alleged offense, an explanation of the examiner's opinion, and the basis of
that opinion; and
(4) An opinion as to whether the defendant presents a
substantial danger to himself, herself, or others or presents a substantial
risk to public safety or to property without a prescribed regimen of medical,
psychiatric, or psychological care or treatment; and
(5) If an examination cannot be conducted because of the
unwillingness of the defendant to participate in the examination, an opinion
as to whether the unwillingness of the defendant is the result of mental
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
disease or defect.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 5-2-331 is amended to read as follows:
5-2-331. Cost of mental health services, examination, and treatment of
defendant.
(a) A person or entity that provides treatment or other mental health
services under this subchapter may impose a charge for the cost of the
treatment or other mental health services rendered.
(b) A charge for the cost of treatment or other mental health services
under this section may not exceed the actual cost of the treatment or other
mental health services provided.
(c)(1) If the Department of Human Services cannot accept a defendant
that has been ordered by a court to the custody of the department, the
department shall be responsible for the cost of the psychotropic medication
prescribed by the department's designated vendor as necessary to restore the
defendant's fitness to proceed.
(2) Responsibility for reimbursement under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall begin on the date that the defendant is ordered to the
custody of the department.
(d)(1) No more than thirty (30) days after the end of each quarter,
the county sheriff or his or her designee shall prepare a quarterly invoice
to be sent to the department for reimbursement that lists:
(A) Each defendant ordered to the custody of the
department that has been detained in the county jail during the previous
month;
(B) The number of days each defendant ordered to the
custody of the department was in the county jail in awaiting-bed-space
status; and
(C) An itemized list of medications prescribed to each
defendant ordered to the custody of the department and the cost of the
medications.
(2) The county sheriff or his or her designee shall provide
supporting documentation to certify the costs to be reimbursed by the
department.
(3) Quarters shall end September 30, December 31, March 31, and
June 30 of each year.
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
(4) The certified invoices shall then be returned to the county
sheriff or his or her designee with the department keeping a duplicate copy.
(5) Payment shall be made within ten (10) business days upon
return of the certified invoices returned to each county.
(e)(1) The county sheriff shall maintain a quarterly invoice for three
(3) calendar years.
(2) The quarterly invoice maintained by the county sheriff is
subject to review by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(3) A quarterly invoice under subsection (d) of this section
shall be sent electronically.
(4) The department shall not issue any reimbursements under this
subsection until the department receives a certified quarterly invoice with
supporting documentation requesting reimbursement.
(f)(1) The Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of
the Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules establishing
reasonable charges for the cost of treatment or other mental health services
under this section.
(2) Rules establishing reasonable charges for the cost of
treatment or other mental health services under this section shall provide
for waiving or postponing the collection of the charges based on:
(A) Clinical considerations;
(B) The defendant's inability to pay; or
(C) A court determination that the defendant is wholly or
partly indigent and qualifies for the appointment of an attorney under § 16-
87-213.

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 5-4-102(c), concerning presentence
investigations is amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) Before imposing sentence, the court may order the defendant to
submit to psychiatric examination and evaluation for a period not to exceed
thirty (30) days.
(2) The defendant may be remanded for psychiatric examination
and evaluation to the Arkansas State Hospital, or the court may appoint a
qualified psychiatrist to make the psychiatric examination and evaluation
court may direct the Department of Human Services to provide a qualified
psychiatrist or qualified psychologist to make the examination and
04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 H4/9/25 SB313
evaluation.

/s/Irvin

































04-09-2025 11:46:37 CEB126